California, session 20252026, AB1885.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 6106.5 of the Public Contract Code is repealed.SEC. 2.Section 6106.5 is added to the Public Contract Code, to read:6106.5.SECTION 1. Section 7202.5 is added to the Public Contract Code, to read:7202.5. (a) “State agency,” as used in this section, means those departments defined in Section 10106, except for the Department of Transportation, which is governed by Section 7202.(b) “Contractor,” as used in this section, means “firm,” “architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, and land surveying services,” “construction project management,” and “environmental services” as defined in Section 4525 of the Government Code.(c) A state agency shall not withhold retention proceeds Notwithstanding Section 7201, retention proceeds withheld from a payment by a state agency when making progress payments to a contractor for work performed on a public works contract. contract shall not exceed 3.5 percent of the payment.(d) Nothing in this section shall alter, amend, or impair the rights, duties, and obligations of an original contractor, its subcontractors, and all subcontractors thereunder relating to the construction of any public work of improvement as set forth in Section 7200.(e) A state agency shall promptly notify the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature if the state agency’s best interests are compromised because retention was not withheld on a state agency public works contract. of the 3.5-percent limitation on retention proceeds imposed by subdivision (c).(f) This section applies to all public works contracts awarded by a state agency after January 1, 2027.(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.